Utah statutes.
48-2e-106.   Governing law.

The law of this state governs:

(1)  the internal affairs of a limited partnership; and

(2)  the liability of a partner as partner for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a limited partnership.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

